California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) “Bakery tray” or “bakery basket” is a plastic or metal container that holds bread or other baked goods and is used by a distributor, retailer, or an agent of the distributor or retailer as a means to transport, store, or carry those products, which has a notice permanently affixed to it that does all of the following: (1) identifies
 the company name of the owner of the item; (2) notifies the public that the unauthorized possession of the item is a violation of state law; and (3) lists an address or telephone number for returning the item to the owner.

(b) “Merchandise pallet” is a wooden or plastic carrier or container, used by a manufacturer or distributor for bulk transport of merchandise to wholesale or retail outlets marked with an indicia of ownership. For purposes of this chapter, “indicia of ownership” means words, symbols, or registered trademarks printed, stamped, etched, attached, or otherwise displayed on the exterior surface of the merchandise pallet that reasonably identify the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22751.

Any person who purchases or leases a bakery tray, bakery basket, or merchandise pallet shall retain a copy of the bill of sale or other evidence that supports the purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 456, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

22752.

As used in this chapter, an “unauthorized person” with respect to possession of a bakery tray, bakery basket, or merchandise pallet includes anyone in possession of one or more of these items, except the following:

(a) The company owner.

(b) A person in lawful possession of the item.

(c) A person who, with the consent of the company owner or the company’s agent, has
 temporary possession of the item as a result of the purchase of the products or merchandise transported using the item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 456, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

22753.

The following acts are punishable as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 489 or in Section 490 of the Penal Code as to any bakery tray, bakery basket, or merchandise pallet described in Section 22750:

(a) Possession of a bakery tray, bakery basket, or merchandise pallet by an unauthorized person.

(b) Obliteration of the company owner’s name on the bakery tray or bakery basket, or obliteration of the indicia of ownership on a merchandise pallet, except by the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 300, Sec. 5.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22754.

An unauthorized person who possesses a bakery tray, bakery basket, or merchandise pallet is subject to civil action. Punitive damages under Section 3294 of the Civil Code and costs shall be awarded to a person who is awarded actual damages arising from a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 24.5. Plastic Bulk Merchandise Containers [22755. - 22755.]

22755.

(a) For purposes of this section, “plastic bulk merchandise container” means a plastic crate or shell used by a product producer, distributor, or retailer, or an agent of the product producer, distributor, or retailer as a means for the bulk transportation, storage, or carrying of retail containers of milk, eggs, or bottled beverage products.

(b) Any person or entity purchasing or transporting plastic bulk merchandise containers, who is in the business of recycling, shredding, or destruction of, or in the business of transporting for
 the purpose of recycling, shredding, or destruction of, plastic bulk merchandise containers, shall obtain a proof of ownership record or bill of lading from a person selling or delivering five or more plastic bulk merchandise containers that shows that the person selling or delivering the containers has lawful possession or ownership of the containers, and shall also verify the seller’s identity by a driver’s license or other government-issued photo identification. The proof of ownership record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and signature of the
 seller or the seller’s authorized representative.

(2) The name and address of the buyer or consignee if not sold.

(3) A description of the product including number of units.

(4) The date of transaction.

(c) The information required to be collected by this section shall be kept for one year from the date of purchase or delivery, whichever is later.

(d) Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 25. AI Transparency Act [22757. - 22757.6.]

22757.

This chapter shall be known as the California AI Transparency Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Artificial intelligence” or “AI” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(b) “Assistive technology” means an item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of individuals with disabilities and any service that directly assists an individual with a disability in the selection, acquisition,
 or use of the item, equipment, or product system.

(c) “Capture device” means a device that can record photographs, audio, or video content, including, but not limited to, video and still photography cameras, mobile phones with built-in cameras or microphones, and voice recorders.

(d) (1) “Capture device manufacturer” means a person who produces a capture device for sale in the state.

(2) “Capture device manufacturer” does not include a person exclusively engaged in the assembly of a capture device.

(e) “Covered provider” means a person that creates, codes, or otherwise produces a generative artificial intelligence system that is publicly
 accessible within the geographic boundaries of the state.

(f) “Digital signature” means a cryptography-based method that identifies the user or entity that attests to the information provided in the signed section.

(g) “Generative artificial intelligence system” or “GenAI system” means an artificial intelligence that can generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the system’s training data.

(h) “GenAI hosting platform” means an internet website or application that makes available for download the source code or model weights a generative artificial intelligence system by a resident of the state, regardless of whether the terms of
 that use include compensation.

(i) (1) “Large online platform” means a public-facing social media platform, file-sharing platform, mass messaging platform, or stand-alone search engine that distributes content to users who did not create or collaborate in creating the content that exceeded 2,000,000 unique monthly users during the preceding 12 months.

(2) “Large online platform” does not include either of the following:

(A) A broadband internet access service, as defined in Section 3100 of the Civil Code.

(B) A telecommunications service, as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(j) “Mass messaging platform” means a direct messaging platform that allows users to distribute content to more than 100 users simultaneously.

(k) “Metadata” means structural or descriptive information about data.

(l) “Minor modification” means any of the following alterations:

(1) A change to brightness, contrast, or color.

(2) Sharpening.

(3) Saturating.

(4) File resizing.

(5) Scaling.

(6) Cropping.

(7) File format conversions.

(8) Denoising and removal of background noise in audio.

(m) “Personal information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.

(n) “Provenance data” means information about the origin of a piece of digital content and the history of modifications to the content that is in a format that is compliant, or interoperable with, widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body.

(o) “System provenance data” means provenance data that is not
 reasonably capable of being associated with a particular user and that contains either of the following:

(1) Information regarding the type of device, system, or service that was used to generate a piece of digital content.

(2) Information related to content authenticity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 2.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.2.

(a) A covered provider shall make available a disclosure verification tool at no cost to the user that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The tool allows a user to assess whether image, video, or audio content, or content that is any combination thereof, was created or altered, except by minor modification, by the covered provider’s GenAI system.

(2) The tool outputs any system provenance data that is detected in the content.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the tool does not output any personal information that is
 detected in the content.

(B) The tool may output personal information that is detected in the content if the user to whom the personal information pertains expressly consents, clearly and conspicuously in plain language, to including personal information specified by the user in the content pursuant to a notice that does both of the following:

(i) Informs the user of the personal information that may be output by the tool.

(ii) Informs the user that once personal information is embedded into provenance data and exported, the information becomes part of the file’s permanent digital footprint and cannot be retracted from copies already in circulation.

(4) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the tool is publicly accessible.

(B) A covered provider may impose reasonable limitations on access to the tool to prevent, or respond to, demonstrable risks to the security or integrity of its GenAI system or to prevent misuse of the tool for malicious purposes.

(5) The tool allows a user to upload content or provide a uniform resource locator (URL) linking to online content.

(6) The tool supports technology, including an application programming interface, that allows a user to invoke the tool without visiting the covered provider’s internet website.

(b) A covered provider shall collect user
 feedback related to the efficacy of the covered provider’s AI disclosure verification tool and incorporate relevant feedback into any attempt to improve the efficacy of the tool.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a covered provider shall not collect, use, retain, sell, share, or otherwise make available personal information derived either from a user of the covered provider’s AI disclosure verification tool or from any content processed by the disclosure verification tool beyond what is
 strictly necessary to comply with this chapter.

(2) A covered provider may collect, retain, or use personal information for the sole purpose of communicating with a user that opts into being contacted by the covered provider.

(d) A covered provider shall not make access to the covered provider’s GenAI system or disclosure verification tool contingent upon a user providing personal information beyond what is strictly necessary
 to comply with this chapter.

(e) A covered provider may satisfy the requirements of this section by directing a user to a third-party disclosure verification tool that is all of the following:

(1) In compliance with this section.

(2) Compatible with latent disclosures included in content produced or altered by the covered provider’s GenAI system.

(3) Clearly and conspicuously accessible through the user interface of the covered provider’s GenAI system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 3.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.3.

(a) To the extent it is technically feasible, a covered provider shall include a latent disclosure that meets all of the following criteria in any image, video, or audio content, or content that is any combination thereof, created or
 altered, except by minor modification, by the covered provider’s GenAI system:

(1) The disclosure conveys all of the following information, either directly or through a link to a permanent internet website:

(A) The name of the covered provider.

(B) The name and version information of the GenAI system that created or altered the content.

(C) The time and date of the content’s creation or alteration.

(D) A unique identifier.

(E) Whether the GenAI system created or altered the content.

(F) On and after January 1, 2029, whether the GenAI system is designed to primarily function as assistive technology.

(2) The disclosure is permanent or extraordinarily difficult to remove or tamper with.

(3) The disclosure is compatible with the covered provider’s disclosure verification tool.

(4) The disclosure is compliant or interoperable with widely
 recognized industry standards.

(b) (1) If a covered provider licenses its GenAI system to a third party, the covered provider shall, when it provides the license, notify the licensee of the licensee’s obligations under this chapter.

(2) If a covered provider knows that an identifiable third-party licensee modified a licensed GenAI system such that it no longer
 complies with this chapter,
 the covered provider shall do either of the following:

(A) Terminate the licensee’s authorization to use the GenAI system within 72 hours of discovering the licensee’s action.

(B) Notify the licensee of both of the following within 72 hours of discovering the licensee’s action:

(i) The licensee’s noncompliance.

(ii) The requirement to report noncompliance with paragraph (3) to the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph (4).

(3) A third-party licensee that receives a notice under paragraph (2) shall modify the licensed GenAI system to be in compliance with this chapter or cease using or making available the licensed GenAI system, including a copy or
 modified version of the GenAI
 system and shall report which of those actions it took to the covered provider within 96 hours of receipt of the notice.

(4) If a covered provider does not receive a report pursuant to paragraph (3) or if a covered provider receives a report from a third-party licensee indicating that the third-party licensee did not, pursuant to paragraph (3), modify or cease using or making available the licensed GenAI system, the covered provider shall report the third-party licensee’s noncompliance with paragraph (3) to the Attorney General.

(5) This subdivision does not require a covered provider to monitor, investigate, or otherwise inquire into a third-party licensee’s use or modification of a licensed GenAI system.

(c) The Attorney General shall establish a mechanism to receive reports from covered providers submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to this section.

(d) A covered provider shall not falsely represent that a GenAI system is designed to primarily function as assistive technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 4.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.3.1.

(a) A large online platform shall do all of the following:

(1) Detect whether any provenance data that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established
 standards-setting body is embedded into or attached to content distributed on the large online platform.

(2) (A) Provide a user interface to disclose the availability of system provenance data that reliably indicates that the content was generated or substantially altered by a GenAI system or captured by a capture device.

(B) The user interface required by this paragraph shall make clearly and conspicuously available to users information sufficient to identify the content’s authenticity, origin, or history of modification, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Whether provenance data is available.

(ii) The name of the GenAI system or capture device that created or substantially altered the content, if
 applicable.

(iii) Whether any digital signatures are available.

(3) Allow a user to inspect all available system provenance data that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body in an easily accessible manner by any of the following means:

(A) Directly through the large online platform’s user interface pursuant to paragraph (2).

(B) Allow the user to download a version of the content with its attached system provenance data.

(C) Provide a link to the content’s system provenance data displayed on an internet website or in another application provided either by the large online platform or a third party.

(b) A large online platform shall not, to the extent technically feasible, knowingly strip any system provenance data or digital signature that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body from content uploaded or distributed on the large online platform.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.3.2.

(a) A GenAI system hosting platform shall not knowingly make available a GenAI system that does not place disclosures pursuant to Section 22757.3.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 674, Sec. 3.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.3.3.

(a) A capture device manufacturer shall, with respect to any capture device the capture device manufacturer first produced for sale in the state on or after January 1, 2028, do both of the
 following:

(1) Provide a user with the option to include a latent disclosure in content captured by the capture device that conveys all of the following information:

(A) The name of the capture device manufacturer.

(B) The name and version number of the capture device that created or altered the content.

(C) The time and date of the content’s creation or alteration.

(2) Embed latent disclosures in content captured by the device by default.

(b) A capture device manufacturer shall comply with this section only to the extent technically feasible and compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 674, Sec. 4.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.4.

(a) (1) A violator of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation to be collected in a civil action filed by the Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel.

(2) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to all reasonable attorney’s costs and fees.

(b) Each day that a covered provider, large online platform, or capture device manufacturer is in violation of this chapter shall be deemed a discrete violation.

(c) A civil action brought under this section before the effective date of the act adding this subdivision shall not be maintained if the alleged conduct does not violate this chapter on and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(d) This section does not apply with respect to a violation of subdivision (d) of Section 22757.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 5.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.4.1.

(a) (1) A violator of subdivision (d) of Section 22757.3 shall be liable for a civil penalty in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation to be collected in a civil action filed by the Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel.

(2) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to all reasonable attorney’s costs and fees.

(b) Each day that a covered provider is in violation of this section shall be deemed a discrete violation.

(c) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 6.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.5.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any product, service, internet website, or application that provides exclusively non-user-generated videogames.

(b) Before January 1, 2029, this chapter does not apply to a GenAI system that is designed to primarily function as assistive technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 861, Sec. 7.   (SB 1000)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.6.

This chapter shall become operative on August 2, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 674, Sec. 6.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 25.1. Transparency in Frontier Artificial Intelligence Act [22757.10. - 22757.16.]

22757.10.

This chapter shall be known as the Transparency in Frontier Artificial Intelligence Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.11.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Affiliate” means a person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with a specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.

(b) “Artificial intelligence model” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level
 of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(c) (1) “Catastrophic risk” means a foreseeable and material risk that a
 frontier developer’s development, storage, use, or deployment of a frontier model will materially contribute to the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in damage to, or loss of, property arising from a single incident involving a frontier model
 doing any of the following:

(A) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation or release of a chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear weapon.

(B) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight, intervention, or supervision that is either a cyberattack or, if the conduct had been committed by a human, would constitute the crime of murder, assault, extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense.

(C) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user.

(2) “Catastrophic risk” does not include a foreseeable and material risk from any of the following:

(A) Information that a frontier model outputs if the information is otherwise publicly accessible in a substantially similar form from a source other than a foundation model.

(B) Lawful activity of the federal government.

(C) Harm caused by a frontier model in combination with other software if the frontier model did not materially contribute to the harm.

(d) “Critical safety incident” means any of the following:

(1) Unauthorized access to, modification of, or exfiltration of, the model weights of a frontier model that results in death or bodily injury.

(2) Harm resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk.

(3) Loss of control of a frontier model causing
 death or bodily injury.

(4) A frontier model that uses deceptive techniques against the frontier developer to subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside of the context of an evaluation designed to elicit this
 behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased catastrophic risk.

(e) (1) “Deploy” means to make a frontier model available to a third party for use, modification, copying, or combination with
 other software.

(2) “Deploy” does not include making a frontier model available to a third party for the primary purpose of developing or evaluating the frontier model.

(f) “Foundation model” means an artificial intelligence model that is all of the following:

(1) Trained on a broad data set.

(2) Designed for generality of output.

(3) Adaptable to a wide range of distinctive tasks.

(g) “Frontier AI framework” means documented technical and organizational protocols to manage, assess, and mitigate catastrophic risks.

(h) “Frontier developer” means a person who has trained, or initiated the training of, a frontier model, with respect to which the person has used, or intends to use, at least as much computing power to train the frontier model as would meet the technical specifications found in subdivision (i).

(i) (1) “Frontier model” means a foundation model that was trained using a quantity of computing power greater than 10^26 integer or floating-point operations.

(2) The quantity of computing power described in paragraph (1) shall include computing for the original training run and for any subsequent fine-tuning, reinforcement learning, or other material modifications the developer applies to a preceding foundation model.

(j) “Large
 frontier developer” means a frontier developer that together with its affiliates collectively had annual gross revenues in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in the preceding calendar year.

(k) “Model weight” means a numerical parameter in a frontier model that is adjusted through training and that helps determine how inputs are transformed into outputs.

(l) “Property” means tangible or intangible property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.12.

(a) A large frontier developer shall write, implement, comply with, and clearly and conspicuously publish on its internet website a frontier AI framework that applies to the large frontier developer’s frontier models and describes how the large frontier developer approaches
 all of the following:

(1) Incorporating national standards, international standards, and industry-consensus best practices into its frontier AI framework.

(2) Defining and assessing thresholds used by the large frontier developer to identify and assess whether a frontier model has capabilities that could pose a catastrophic risk, which may include multiple-tiered thresholds.

(3) Applying mitigations to address the potential for catastrophic risks based on the results of assessments undertaken pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) Reviewing assessments and adequacy of mitigations as part of the decision to deploy a frontier model or use it extensively internally.

(5) Using third parties to assess the potential for catastrophic risks and the effectiveness of mitigations of catastrophic risks.

(6) Revisiting and updating the frontier AI framework,
 including any criteria that trigger updates and how the large frontier developer determines when its frontier models are substantially modified enough to require disclosures pursuant to subdivision (c).

(7) Cybersecurity practices to secure unreleased model weights from unauthorized modification or transfer by internal or external parties.

(8) Identifying and responding to critical safety incidents.

(9) Instituting internal governance practices to ensure implementation of these processes.

(10) Assessing and managing catastrophic risk resulting from the internal use of its frontier models, including risks resulting from a frontier model circumventing oversight mechanisms.

(b) (1) A large frontier developer shall review and, as appropriate, update its frontier AI framework at least once per year.

(2) If a large frontier developer makes a material modification to its
 frontier AI framework, the large frontier developer shall clearly and conspicuously publish the modified frontier AI framework and a justification for that modification within 30 days.

(c) (1) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new
 frontier model or a substantially modified version of an existing frontier model, a frontier developer shall clearly and conspicuously publish on its internet website a transparency report containing all of the following:

(A) The internet website of the frontier developer.

(B) A mechanism that enables a natural person to communicate with the frontier developer.

(C) The release date of the frontier model.

(D) The languages supported by the frontier model.

(E) The modalities of output supported by the frontier model.

(F) The intended uses of the frontier model.

(G) Any generally applicable restrictions or conditions on uses of the frontier model.

(2) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier model or a
 substantially modified version of an existing frontier model, a large frontier developer shall include in the transparency report required by paragraph (1) summaries of all of the following:

(A) Assessments of catastrophic risks from the frontier model conducted pursuant to the large frontier developer’s frontier AI framework.

(B) The results of those assessments.

(C) The extent to which third-party evaluators were involved.

(D) Other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of the frontier AI framework with respect to the frontier model.

(3) A frontier developer that publishes the information described in paragraph (1) or (2) as part of a larger document, including a system card or model
 card, shall be deemed in compliance with the applicable paragraph.

(4) A frontier developer is encouraged, but not required, to make disclosures described in this subdivision that are consistent with, or superior to, industry best practices.

(d) A large
 frontier developer shall transmit to the Office of Emergency Services a summary of any assessment of catastrophic risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models
 every three months or pursuant to another reasonable schedule specified by the large frontier developer and communicated in writing to the Office of Emergency Services with written updates, as appropriate.

(e) (1) (A) A frontier
 developer shall not make a materially false or misleading statement about catastrophic risk from its frontier models or its management of catastrophic risk.

(B) A large frontier developer shall not make a materially false or misleading statement about its implementation of, or compliance with, its frontier AI framework.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a statement that was made
 in good faith and was reasonable under the circumstances.

(f) (1) When a frontier developer publishes documents to comply with this section, the frontier developer may make redactions to those documents that are necessary to protect the frontier developer’s trade secrets, the
 frontier developer’s cybersecurity, public safety, or the national security of the United States or to comply with any federal or state law.

(2) If a frontier developer redacts information in a document pursuant to this subdivision, the frontier developer shall describe the character and justification of the redaction in any published version of the document to the extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction and shall retain the unredacted
 information for five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.13.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall establish a mechanism to be used by a frontier developer or a member of the public to report a critical safety incident that includes all of the following:

(1) The date of the critical safety incident.

(2) The reasons the incident qualifies as a critical safety incident.

(3) A short and plain statement describing the critical safety incident.

(4) Whether the incident was associated with internal use of a frontier model.

(b) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall establish a mechanism to be used by a large frontier developer to confidentially submit summaries of any assessments of the potential for catastrophic risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models.

(2) The Office of Emergency Services shall
 take all necessary precautions to limit access to any reports related to internal use of frontier models to only personnel with a specific need to know the information and to protect the reports from unauthorized access.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a
 frontier developer shall report any critical safety incident pertaining to one or more of its frontier models to the Office of Emergency Services within 15 days of discovering the critical safety incident.

(2) If a frontier developer discovers that a critical
 safety incident poses an imminent risk of death or serious physical injury, the frontier
 developer shall disclose that incident within 24 hours to an authority, including any law enforcement agency or public safety agency with jurisdiction, that is appropriate based on the nature of that incident and as required by law.

(3) A frontier developer that discovers information about a critical safety incident after filing the initial report required by this subdivision may file an amended report.

(4) A frontier developer is encouraged, but not required, to report critical safety incidents pertaining to foundation models that are not frontier models.

(d) The
 Office of Emergency Services shall review critical safety incident reports submitted by frontier developers and may review reports submitted by members of the public.

(e) (1) The Attorney General
 or the Office of Emergency Services
 may transmit reports of critical safety incidents and reports from covered employees made pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 1107) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Labor Code to the Legislature, the Governor, the federal government, or appropriate state agencies.

(2) The Attorney General or the Office of Emergency Services shall strongly consider any risks related to trade secrets, public safety, cybersecurity of a frontier developer, or national security when transmitting reports.

(f) A report of a critical safety incident submitted to the
 Office of Emergency Services pursuant to this section, a report of assessments of catastrophic risk from internal use pursuant to Section 22757.12, and a covered employee report made pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 1107) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Labor
 Code are exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(g) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Office of Emergency Services shall produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about critical safety incidents that have been reviewed by the Office of Emergency Services since the preceding report.

(2) The Office of Emergency Services shall not include information in a report pursuant to this subdivision that would compromise the trade secrets or cybersecurity of a frontier developer, public safety, or
 the national security of the United States or that would be prohibited by any federal or state law.

(3) The Office of Emergency Services shall transmit a report pursuant to this subdivision to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795, and to the Governor.

(h) The Office of Emergency Services may adopt regulations designating one or more federal laws, regulations, or guidance documents that meet all of the following conditions for the purposes of subdivision (i):

(1) (A) The
 law, regulation, or guidance document imposes or states standards or requirements for critical safety incident reporting that are substantially equivalent to, or stricter than, those required by this section.

(B) The law, regulation, or guidance document described in subparagraph (A) does not need to require critical safety incident reporting to the State of California.

(2) The law, regulation, or guidance document is intended to assess, detect, or mitigate the catastrophic risk.

(i) (1) A frontier developer that intends to comply with this section by complying with the requirements of, or meeting the standards stated by, a federal law, regulation, or guidance document designated pursuant to subdivision (h) shall declare its intent to do so to the Office of Emergency Services.

(2) After a frontier developer has declared its intent pursuant to paragraph (1), both of the following apply:

(A) The frontier developer shall be deemed in compliance with this section to the extent that the frontier developer meets the standards of, or complies with the requirements imposed or stated by, the designated federal law, regulation, or guidance document until the frontier developer declares the revocation of that intent to the Office of Emergency Services or the Office of Emergency Services revokes a relevant regulation pursuant to subdivision (j).

(B) The failure by a frontier developer to meet the standards of, or comply with the requirements stated by, the federal law, regulation, or guidance document designated pursuant to subdivision (h) shall constitute a violation of this chapter.

(j) The Office of Emergency Services shall revoke a regulation adopted under subdivision (h) if the requirements of subdivision (h) are no longer met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22757.14.

(a) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Department of Technology shall assess recent evidence and developments relevant to the purposes of this chapter and shall make recommendations about whether and how to update
 any of the following definitions
 for the purposes of this chapter to ensure that they accurately reflect
 technological developments, scientific literature, and widely accepted national and international standards:

(1) “Frontier model” so that it applies to foundation models at the frontier of artificial intelligence development.

(2) “Frontier developer” so that it applies to developers of frontier models who are themselves at the frontier of artificial intelligence development.

(3) “Large frontier developer” so that it applies to well-resourced frontier developers.

(b) In making recommendations pursuant to this section, the Department of Technology shall take into account all of the following:

(1) Similar thresholds used in international standards or federal
 law, guidance, or regulations for the management of catastrophic risk and shall align with a definition adopted in a federal law or regulation to the extent that it is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Input from stakeholders, including academics, industry, the open-source community, and governmental entities.
